Utah statutes.
70A-2-605.   Waiver of buyer's objections by failure to particularize.
(1)  The buyer's failure to state in connection with rejection a particular
defect which is ascertainable by reasonable inspection precludes him from
relying on the unstated defect to justify rejection or to establish breach:
(a)  where the seller could have cured it if stated seasonably; or
(b)  between merchants when the seller has after rejection made a request in
writing for a full and final written statement of all defects on which the
buyer proposes to rely.
(2)  Payment against documents made without reservation of rights precludes
recovery of the payment for defects apparent in the documents.
